firefox-addon/dictionaries/tr.dic
akşamsefası/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
alınyazısı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
antepfıstığı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
arapsaçı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
arnavutkaldırımı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
atbaşı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
aybalığı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
ayıbacağı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
ayışığı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
bacabaşı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
balarısı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
balkabağı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
balıkyağı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
barbaşı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
beziryağı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
bilinçaltı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
boyunbağı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
buzdolabı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
bülbülkonağı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
cumhurbaşkanlığı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
cumhurbaşkanı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖
dağalası/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
defneyaprağı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
denizaslanı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
denizkadayıfı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
deniztarağı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
denizşakayığı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
devetabanı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
dilberdudağı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
dizkapağı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
donyağı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
ekinkargası/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
elyazması/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
eşekarısı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
fenerbalığı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
gazyuvarı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
gresyağı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
gölalası/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
gözkapağı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
gözyuvarı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
günbalığı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
hacıyağı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
hamamtası/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
Havaalanı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
havagazı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
havalimanı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖
hintkamışı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
imamkayığı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
içyağı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
işhanı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
kamçıbaşı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
karınzarı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
kayıtdışı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
kedibalığı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
keçiayağı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
kişilikdışı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
kumbalığı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
kurtayağı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
kuyrukyağı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
kuşbakışı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
kökboyası/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
kılıçbalığı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
malvarlığı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
meyanbalı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
mısıryağı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
onikiparmakbağırsağı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
papazbalığı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
pervanebalığı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
resimyazı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
sandalağacı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
semazenbaşı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
sualtı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
sukamışı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
sutaşı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
süpürgedarısı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
tamsayı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
tavşanağzı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
tekesakalı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
toprakaltı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
usdışı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
veritabanı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
yabankazı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
yeraltı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
yersarsıntısı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
yiğitbaşı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
yüzükparmağı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
yılbaşı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
âdemelması/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
çamsakızı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
çeşnicibaşı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
çobanyıldızı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
öntakı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
şahdamarı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
şeytantırnağı/∈∀≡∥≉∩∡≇∸≀∰∴∺∻∎∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
